Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-311
Familial status, defined.

Familial status shall mean one or more minors being domiciled with:

(1) A parent or another person having legal custody of such individual; or

(2) The designee of a parent or other person having legal custody, with the written permission of the parent or other person.

The protections afforded against discrimination on the basis of familial status shall apply to any person who is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal custody of any minor.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 12.